Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4501
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-4501 to 44-4521 shall be known and may be cited as the Long-Term Care Insurance Act.

Laws 1987, LB 416, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 44;

Laws 1999, LB 323, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB117, § 9.